Vermont statutes. Title 14 Decedents’ Estates and Fiduciary Relations
Subchapter 2. Survivors’ Rights and Allowances

§ 311.
Share of surviving spouse.

After payment of the debts, funeral charges, allowances to the surviving spouse and children pursuant to sections 316 and 317 of this title, and expenses of administration, the intestate share of the decedent’s surviving spouse is as follows:

The surviving spouse shall receive the entire intestate estate if no descendant of the decedent survives the decedent or if all of the decedent’s surviving descendants are also descendants of the surviving spouse.

In the event there shall survive the decedent one or more descendants of the decedent who are not descendants of the surviving spouse and are not excluded by the decedent’s will from inheriting from the decedent, the surviving spouse shall receive one-half of the intestate estate.

HISTORY:

Added

2009, No. 55

, § 5, eff. June 1, 2009; amended

2017, No. 195

(Adj. Sess.), § 3.

§ 312.
Surviving spouse to receive household goods.

Upon motion, the surviving spouse of a decedent may receive out of the decedent’s estate all furnishings and furniture in the decedent’s household. If any objection is made, the Probate Division of the Superior Court shall decide what, if any, of such personalty shall pass under this section. Goods and effects so assigned shall be in addition to the distributive share of the estate to which the surviving spouse is entitled under other provisions of law. In making a determination pursuant to this section, the Probate Division of the Superior Court may consider the length of the decedent’s marriage or civil union, the sentimental and monetary value of the property, and the source of the decedent’s interest in the property.

HISTORY:

Added

2009, No. 55

, § 5, eff. June 1, 2009; amended

2009, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 238a, eff. Feb. 1, 2011;

2017, No. 195

(Adj. Sess.), § 3.

§ 313.
Surviving spouse; vessel, snowmobile, or all-terrain vehicle.

Whenever the estate of a decedent who dies intestate consists principally of a vessel, snowmobile, or all-terrain vehicle, the surviving spouse shall be deemed to be the owner of the vessel, snowmobile, or all-terrain vehicle, and title to the vessel, snowmobile, or all-terrain vehicle shall automatically pass to the surviving spouse. The surviving spouse may register the vessel, snowmobile, or all-terrain vehicle pursuant to

23 V.S.A. § 3816

.

HISTORY:

Added

2009, No. 55

, § 5, eff. June 1, 2009.

§ 314.
Share of heirs other than surviving spouse.

The balance of the intestate estate not passing to the decedent’s surviving spouse under section 311 of this title passes to the decedent’s descendants by right of representation.

If there is no taker under subsection (a) of this section, the intestate estate passes in the following order:

to the decedent’s parents equally if both survive or to the surviving parent;

to the decedent’s siblings and the descendants of any deceased siblings by right of representation;

one-half of the intestate estate to the decedent’s paternal grandparents equally if they both survive or to the surviving paternal grandparent and one-half of the intestate estate to the decedent’s maternal grandparents equally if they both survive or to the surviving maternal grandparent and if decedent is survived by a grandparent, or grandparents on only one side, to that grandparent or those grandparents;

in equal shares to the next of kin in equal degree.

If property passes under this section by right of representation, the property shall be divided into as many equal shares as there are children or siblings of the decedent, as the case may be, who either survive the decedent or who predecease the decedent leaving surviving descendants.

HISTORY:

Added

2009, No. 55

, § 5, eff. June 1, 2009.

§ 315.
Parent and child relationship.

For the purpose of intestate succession, an individual is the child of his or her parents, regardless of their marital status, but a parent shall not inherit from a child unless the parent has openly acknowledged the child and not refused to support the child.

The parent and child relationship may be established in parentage proceedings under Title 15C.

A parent shall not inherit from a child conceived of sexual assault who is the subject of a parental rights and responsibilities order issued pursuant to

15 V.S.A. § 665(f)

.

HISTORY:

Added

2009, No. 55

, § 5, eff. June 1, 2009; amended

2017, No. 44

, § 6, eff. May 23, 2017;

2017, No. 195

(Adj. Sess.), § 3.

§ 316.
Allowances for surviving spouse and family during administration.

The Probate Division of the Superior Court may make reasonable allowance for the necessary expenses of support and maintenance of the surviving spouse and minor children or either, constituting the family of a decedent, out of the personal estate or the income of real or personal estate from date of death until settlement of the estate, but for no longer a period than until their shares in the estate are assigned to them or, in case of an insolvent estate, for not more than eight months after administration is granted. This allowance may take priority, in the discretion of the court, over debts of the estate.

HISTORY:

Added

2009, No. 55

, § 5, eff. June 1, 2009; amended

2009, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 236, eff. Feb. 1, 2011;

2017, No. 195

(Adj. Sess.), § 3.

§ 317.
Allowance to children before payment of debts.

The court may make reasonable allowance for the necessary expenses of support and maintenance of any children of the decedent until they reach 18 years of age. The court may order the executor or administrator to retain sufficient estate assets for that purpose, except where some provision is made by will for their support. The allowance shall be made before any distribution of the estate among creditors, heirs, or beneficiaries by will.

HISTORY:

Added

2009, No. 55

, § 5, eff. June 1, 2009; amended

2017, No. 195

(Adj. Sess.), § 3.

§ 318.
Allowance to children after payment of debts.

Before any partition or division of an estate among the heirs or beneficiaries by will, an allowance may be made for the necessary expenses of support and maintenance of the children of the decedent until they reach 18 years of age. The Probate Division of the Superior Court may order the executor or administrator to retain sufficient estate assets for that purpose, except where some provision is made by will for their support.

HISTORY:

Added

2009, No. 55

, § 5, eff. June 1, 2009; amended

2009, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 236, eff. Feb. 1, 2011;

2017, No. 195

(Adj. Sess.), § 3.

§ 319.
Elective share of surviving spouse; notice of rights.

Subject to subsection (d) of this section, a surviving spouse may elect to waive the provisions of the decedent’s will and in lieu thereof elect to take one-half of the balance of the probate estate, after the payment of allowances, claims, and expenses.

The surviving spouse must be living at the time this election is made. An election under this section may be signed on behalf of the surviving spouse by a guardian, an agent, or an attorney-in-fact under a power of attorney that:

expressly grants the authority to make the election; or

grants the agent or attorney-in-fact the authority to act in the management and disposition of the principal’s property that is as broad or comprehensive as the principal could exercise for himself or herself; and
(2) (A) grants the agent or attorney-in-fact the authority to act in the management and disposition of the principal’s property that is as broad or comprehensive as the principal could exercise for himself or herself; and

does not expressly exclude the authority to make the election.

An agent or attorney-in-fact may petition the Probate Division of the Superior Court to determine whether a power of attorney described in subdivision (b)(2) grants the agent or attorney-in-fact authority that is as broad or comprehensive as that which the principal could exercise for himself or herself.

A surviving spouse may not elect against a deceased spouse’s will under this section if the surviving spouse has waived the right to elect against the deceased spouse’s will pursuant to section 323 of this title.

The court shall provide the surviving spouse with a notice of the rights of the surviving spouse not later than 30 days from the filing of the initial inventory.
(e) (1) The court shall provide the surviving spouse with a notice of the rights of the surviving spouse not later than 30 days from the filing of the initial inventory.

Unless otherwise ordered by the court, a surviving spouse shall file with the court a written election to waive the provisions of a decedent’s will within four months of the later of the following dates:

the date of service of the notice of rights of surviving spouse; or

the date of service of the inventory.

Upon the filing of any subsequent or amended inventory or any accounting that reports previously undisclosed property owned by the decedent as of the date of death, the surviving spouse shall have 30 days from the date of service of the filing to elect against the newly reported property, unless otherwise ordered by the court.

HISTORY:

Added

2009, No. 55

, § 5, eff. June 1, 2009; amended

2017, No. 195

(Adj. Sess.), § 3.

§ 320.
Effect of divorce order.

A final divorce or dissolution order from any state shall nullify a gift by will to an individual who was the decedent’s spouse at the time the will was executed and any nomination of the spouse as executor, executrix, trustee, guardian, or other fiduciary as named in the will, if the decedent was no longer married to or in a civil union with that individual at the time of death, unless the decedent’s will specifically states to the contrary.

HISTORY:

Added

2009, No. 55

, § 5, eff. June 1, 2009; amended

2017, No. 195

(Adj. Sess.), § 3.

§ 321.
Conveyance to defeat spouse’s interest.

A voluntary transfer of any property by an individual during a marriage or civil union and not to take effect until at or after the individual’s death, made without adequate consideration and for the primary purpose of defeating a surviving spouse’s right to claim the survivor’s intestate or elective share of the decedent’s property so transferred, shall be void and inoperative to bar the claim, unless the surviving spouse waived the survivor’s right to make a claim against the deceased spouse’s estate or the property transferred pursuant to section 323 of this title. If the surviving spouse has not signed a waiver of spousal rights pursuant to section 323 of this title, then the decedent shall be deemed at the time of his or her death to be the owner of the property and the court may:

increase the surviving spouse’s share of the decedent’s probate estate in an amount the court deems reasonable to account for the right the surviving spouse would otherwise have had in the property so transferred; or

if the assets of the decedent’s probate estate are insufficient to account for the right the surviving spouse would otherwise have had in the property, then order any other equitable relief the court deems appropriate.

Neither this section nor any other provision of this title shall be construed to affect an enhanced life estate deed. As used in this subsection, “enhanced life estate deed,” also known as a “Ladybird deed,” shall mean a deed that conveys a future interest in real estate that is revocable or otherwise subject to limitation, with the transfer of the remaining title rights to take place when the grantor dies.

HISTORY:

Added

2009, No. 55

, § 5, eff. June 1, 2009; amended

2017, No. 195

(Adj. Sess.), § 3.

§ 322.
Unlawful killing affecting inheritance.

Notwithstanding sections 311 through 314 of this title or provisions otherwise made, in any case in which an individual is entitled to inherit or receive property under the last will of a decedent, or otherwise, the individual’s share in the decedent’s estate shall be forfeited and shall pass to the remaining heirs or beneficiaries of the decedent if the individual intentionally and unlawfully kills the decedent. In any proceedings to contest the right of an individual to inherit or receive property under a will or otherwise, the record of that individual’s conviction of intentionally and unlawfully killing the decedent shall be admissible in evidence and shall conclusively establish that the individual did intentionally and unlawfully kill the decedent.

HISTORY:

Added

2009, No. 55

, § 5, eff. June 1, 2009; amended

2017, No. 195

(Adj. Sess.), § 3.

§ 323.
Written waiver of spousal rights.

At any time before or during a marriage, a spouse may waive the right to an elective share of a deceased spouse’s estate, waive the right to a homestead or other allowance, and waive any other spousal rights or interest in property, in whole or in part, by a written instrument signed by the waiving spouse.

A written waiver of spousal rights is presumed to be valid unless the party contesting the waiver demonstrates that:

the waiver was not voluntary, or was made as a result of fraud, duress, or coercion;

the waiver was unconscionable when signed or is unconscionable in its application due to a material change in circumstances that arose subsequent to the execution of the instrument through no fault or no action of the contesting party;

before signing the waiver, the waiving spouse was not provided fair and reasonable disclosure of the property and financial obligations of the decedent; or

before signing the waiver, the waiving spouse did not have an opportunity for meaningful access to independent counsel.

A waiver under this section may be signed on behalf of a waiving spouse by a guardian or by an agent or an attorney-in-fact under a power of attorney that:

expressly grants the authority to make the election; or

grants the agent or attorney-in-fact the authority to act in the management and disposition of the principal’s property that is as broad or comprehensive as the principal could exercise for himself or herself; and
(2) (A) grants the agent or attorney-in-fact the authority to act in the management and disposition of the principal’s property that is as broad or comprehensive as the principal could exercise for himself or herself; and

does not expressly exclude the authority to make the election.

An agent or attorney-in-fact may petition the Probate Division of the Superior Court to determine whether a power of attorney described in subdivision (c)(2) grants the agent or attorney-in-fact authority that is as broad or comprehensive as that which the principal could exercise for himself or herself.

HISTORY:

Added

2017, No. 195

(Adj. Sess.), § 3.